Georgia, session 2025_26, HB550.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Code Section 20-2B-23 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to requirements
for participating schools, responsibilities of education savings authority, prohibited
requirements, and agency not established, is amended by adding a new subsection to read as
follows:
"(h) Each participating school shall prepare a school safety plan that meets the
requirements for school safety plans of public schools as set forth in Code Section
20-2-1185."
H. B. 550
- 1 -

LC 61 0110
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 550
- 2 -